Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1204.01
Unlawful
transfer of a firearm to a juvenile; exceptions; penalty; county attorney;
duty.

(1) Any person who knowingly and intentionally
does or attempts to sell, provide, loan, deliver, or in any other way transfer
the possession of a firearm to a juvenile commits the offense of unlawful
transfer of a firearm to a juvenile. The county attorney shall have a copy
of the petition served upon the owner of the firearm, if known, in person
or by registered or certified mail at his or her last-known address.

(2) This section does not apply to the transfer
of a firearm, other
than a
handgun, to a juvenile:

(a) From a person related to such juvenile within the second
degree of consanguinity or affinity if the transfer of physical possession
of such firearm does not occur until such time as express permission has been
obtained from the juvenile's parent or guardian;

(b) For a legitimate and lawful sporting purpose; or

(c) Who is under direct adult supervision in an appropriate
educational program.

(3) This section applies to
the transfer of a
handgun except as specifically provided in subsection (2) of section
28-1204.

(4) Unlawful transfer of a firearm to a juvenile is a Class III felony.

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 12.